West Virginia, session 2025, SB810.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 7. registered Professional nurses. §30-7-15. Administration of anesthetics. (a) A certified registered nurse anesthetist may administer anesthesia in cooperation with a physician, dentist, or podiatrist when providing the anesthesia.(1) As used in this section, “cooperation” means a process in which the certified registered nurse anesthetist and the physician, dentist, or podiatrist work together as a team with each contributing an area of expertise at their individual and respective levels of education and training.  At all times during such cooperation, the medical or dental care of the patient is directed by the physician, dentist, or podiatrist.(2) A dentist may cooperate with a certified registered nurse anesthetist under this section only if he or she holds an anesthesia permit pursuant to article §30-4A-1 et seq. of this code.(3) The physician, dentist, or podiatrist is not liable for any act or omission of a certified registered nurse anesthetist who orders or administers anesthetics under this section.(b) A certified registered nurse anesthetist lawfully may perform acts that determine, prepare, administer, and monitor anesthesia care and anesthesia care-related services if he or she:(1) Has at any time held a registered professional nursing license under this article; and(2) Holds a current advanced practice registered nurse license under this article; and(3) Has completed successfully a nurse anesthetist educational program at a nationally accredited graduate or post-graduate advanced practice registered nurse educational institution; and(4) Holds current certification by a national certifying body recognized by the Board of Nursing in the advanced practice registered nurse role and population foci appropriate for educational preparation. (c) A certified registered nurse anesthetist does not have independent practice authority.(d) A licensed advanced practice registered nurse practicing in the role of certified registered nurse anesthetist may only use the title "certified registered nurse anesthetist", "CRNA", "advanced practice registered nurse", or "APRN". (e) On or before July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the Board of Nursing shall report to the Legislature regarding the implementation and impact of this section.  The report shall include:(1) Any problems or issues that have been reported to the board by hospitals, dental offices, podiatrist offices, ambulatory surgical centers, and all other locations where nurse anesthetists are authorized to practice in the state; and(2) Any treatment complications resulting from the administration of anesthesia by certified registered nurse anesthetists.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home